Washington statutes.
RCW 11.11.090

Transfer of nonprobate asset to testamentary beneficiary.

(1) A financial institution's or third party's obligation to transfer a nonprobate asset to a testamentary beneficiary arises only after it has actual knowledge of the claim of the testamentary beneficiary, and after receiving written direction from the personal representative of the owner's estate, or if the personal representative consents in writing, from the testamentary beneficiary, to make the transfer. The financial institution may also require that its customary procedures be followed in effectuating a transfer of the nonprobate asset.

(2) Subject to subsection (1) of this section, financial institutions and other third parties may transfer a nonprobate asset that has not already been distributed to the testamentary beneficiary entitled to the nonprobate asset under the owner's will, subject to liabilities and claims, estate taxes, and expenses of administration under RCW 11.18.200.

[ 1998 c 292 s 113.]